New Jersey, session 221, A1292.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  An electric public utility shall not install an advanced or smart energy meter unless the electric public utility has obtained the customers written consent, as determined by the board, and has provided the customer with a written disclosure detailing the type of data that will be transmitted from a customers advanced or smart energy meter to the electric public utility, how the data will be used, and any potential disclosure of the data to a third-party. b.    As used in this section: Advanced or smart energy meter means an electrical meter that identifies a customers electric power consumption in greater detail than a conventional meter in order to provide a customer with real-time usage information and pricing data on at least an hourly basis, to record and store hourly usage data, to report the status of the electric power supply to an electric public utility for the customers premises, and to turn the electric power to the customers premises on or off through remote disconnection or connection of service. Board and electric public utility shall have the same meaning as prescribed for those terms under section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day after the date of enactment.